Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.350

Violations—Consumer Protection Act.

The consumers of this state have a right to be protected from unfair or deceptive acts or practices when they enter into contracts with contractors. The fact that a contractor is found to have committed a misdemeanor or infraction under this chapter shall be deemed to affect the public interest and shall constitute a violation of chapter 19.86 RCW. The surety bond shall not be liable for monetary penalties or violations of chapter 19.86 RCW.

[ 1986 c 197 s 11.]